Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.020

Excluded cities—Repeal of local law—Effect.

If any of the cities or towns referred to in RCW 41.08.010 shall at any time repeal the charter provisions or other local acts of said cities or towns providing for civil service for firefighters as referred to in RCW 41.08.010, in that event this chapter shall apply to all of such cities and towns which have at any time abolished civil service for members of the fire department.

[ 2007 c 218 s 2; 1935 c 31 s 2; RRS s 9558-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: "It is the intent of the legislature to make technical changes throughout chapters 41.08, 41.12, 41.16, and 41.18 RCW with regard to gender-specific terminology. The legislature finds that gender-neutral terms must be used in accordance with RCW 44.04.210. This act is technical in nature and no substantive legal changes are intended or implied." [ 2007 c 218 s 1.]